src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-t-sanat-norm_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kevät: # GOLD
    kevät+N+Sg+Nom: kevät
    kevät+N+Sg+Gen: kevhään
    kevät+N+Sg+Par: kevättä
    kevät+N+Sg+Tra: kevhääksi
    kevät+N+Sg+Abe: kevhäättä
    kevät+N+Sg+Ine: kevhäässä
    kevät+N+Sg+Ela: kevhäästä
    kevät+N+Sg+Ill: kevhääsheen
    kevät+N+Sg+Ade: kevhäälä
    kevät+N+Sg+Abl: kevhäältä
    kevät+N+Sg+All: kevhääle
    kevät+N+Sg+Ess: kevhäänä
    kevät+N+Pl+Nom: kevhäät
    kevät+N+Pl+Gen: kevhäitten
    kevät+N+Pl+Par: kevhäitä
    kevät+N+Pl+Tra: kevhäiksi
    kevät+N+Pl+Abe: kevhäittä
    kevät+N+Pl+Ine: kevhäissä
    kevät+N+Pl+Ela: kevhäistä
    kevät+N+Pl+Ill: kevhäishiin
    kevät+N+Pl+Ade: kevhäilä
    kevät+N+Pl+Abl: kevhäiltä
    kevät+N+Pl+All: kevhäile
    kevät+N+Pl+Ess: [kevhäinä, kevväinä]
